Missouri, session 2026, HB1954.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 441, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 441.237, to read as follows:
441.237. 1. As used in this section, the word "pests" means any unwanted:
(1) Member of the class Insecta including, but not limited to, houseflies, bees,
cockroaches, moths, silverfish, beetles, bedbugs, ants, termites, hornets, mosquitoes, and
wasps;
(2) Member of the phylum Arthropoda including, but not limited to, spiders,
mites, ticks, centipedes, and wood lice; and
(3) Member of the order Rodentia including, but not limited to, mice and
Norway rats.
2. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a landlord of a premises shall
be liable for damages to a tenant of such premises if, through no fault of the tenant, the
premises contain conditions that would materially affect the health and safety of the
tenant and the landlord fails to begin remediation of such conditions within thirty days
after the tenant notifies the landlord in writing of such conditions. Conditions that
would materially affect the health and safety of the tenant include, but are not limited
to, hazardous mold, rotting or deteriorating floors, sewage backup, roof leaks, or
infestation of pests.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1954 2
(2) Damages under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall include, but are not
limited to, any health care costs associated with the failure to remedy a condition that
would materially affect the health and safety of the tenant.
3. After the landlord completes the remediation required under subsection 2 of
this section, the landlord shall have the premises inspected by a licensed inspector, and
the inspector shall determine whether the conditions that materially affected the health
and safety of the tenant have been corrected.
✔